apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="g/ive__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ive</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ive</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ives</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ave</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iven</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sw/ear__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ear</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ear</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ears</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ore</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>orn</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fr/eeze__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eeze</l>
        <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eeze</l>
        <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eezes</l>
        <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>oze</l>
        <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ozen</l>
        <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eezing</l>
        <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eezing</l>
        <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eezing</l>
        <r>eeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/et__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>et</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>et</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ets</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ot</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ot</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>otten</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>etting</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>etting</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>etting</l>
        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/ang__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ang</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ang</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>angs</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anged</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ung</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anged</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ung</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anging</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anging</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anging</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hear__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="swear" i=""><i>sw</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="tear" i=""><i>t</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="wear" i=""><i>w</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="give prominence" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>prominence</l><r><g><b/>prominence</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="give an order" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>an<b/>order</l><r><g><b/>an<b/>order</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get through the end-of-year exams" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>through<b/>the<b/>end-of-year<b/>exams</l><r><g><b/>through<b/>the<b/>end-of-year<b/>exams</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="give no respite" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>no<b/>respite</l><r><g><b/>no<b/>respite</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="give respite" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>respite</l><r><g><b/>respite</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="give complex" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>complex</l><r><g><b/>complex</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get a complex" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>complex</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>complex</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get flu" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>flu</l><r><g><b/>flu</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get tight" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>tight</l><r><g><b/>tight</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get anxious" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>anxious</l><r><g><b/>anxious</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get into knots" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into<b/>knots</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>knots</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get excited" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>excited</l><r><g><b/>excited</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="forgive" i=""><i>forg</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="freeze" i=""><i>fr</i><par n="fr/eeze__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="give" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="get" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="get cover" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>cover</l><r><g><b/>cover</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get dark" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>dark</l><r><g><b/>dark</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="give up smoking" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up<b/>smoking</l><r><g><b/>up<b/>smoking</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="hang" i=""><i>h</i><par n="h/ang__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="hear" i=""><i>hear</i><par n="hear__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="swear" i=""><i>sw</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="tear" i=""><i>t</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="wear" i=""><i>w</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="freeze" i=""><i>fr</i><par n="fr/eeze__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="get along" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>along</l><r><g><b/>along</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get away" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get back" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get bigger" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>bigger</l><r><g><b/>bigger</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get dressed" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>dressed</l><r><g><b/>dressed</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get in trouble" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>trouble</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>trouble</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get on" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get worse" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>worse</l><r><g><b/>worse</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="hang up" i=""><i>h</i><par n="h/ang__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="hang-up" i=""><i>h</i><par n="h/ang__vblex"/><p><l>-up</l><r><g>-up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="get obsessed with" i=""><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>obsessed<b/>with</l><r><g><b/>obsessed<b/>with</g></r></p></e>
